Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2201.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; State Route 89A, Forest Road and Ranger Road The sum of $8,025,600 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the city of Sedona for State Route 89A, Forest Road and Ranger Road construction and improvement projects.